Tennessee, session 114, SB0487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-1-128(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "one hundred billion dollars ($100,000,000,000)" and substituting "fifty
billion dollars ($50,000,000,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0487
000105
- 1 -